apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="minist/er__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erne</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erer</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ere</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eren</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="/and_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ænderne</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ænder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anden</l>      <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ænderne</l>    <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ænder</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anden</l>     <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="buffer__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="amanuens/is__n">
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>       <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\'__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="drikke__n" c="was sør_n">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hygiejne__n" c="was re__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="hygiejne_\s__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\s_LR_Ø\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="hygiejne_no-cp__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp\Ø\s__case"/></e>
</pardef>

 <pardef n="sted__n">
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bom__n">
  <e>       <p><l>mene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="åg/er__n">
  <e>       <p><l>rene</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>rer</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eren</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="podi/um__n">
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>       <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both\Ø_LR_s\S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erne</l>         <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="amanuensis">                <i>amanuens</i><par n="amanuens/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="ane">                       <i>ane</i><par n="hygiejne_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="retsforfølgelse">                  <i>retsforfølgelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="bestyrelse">      <i>bestyrelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="brændevin">                 <i>brændevin</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
<e lm="bæst">                     <i>bæst</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
<e lm="drikke">                    <i>drikke</i><par n="drikke__n"/></e>
<e lm="drøm">                      <i>drøm</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="efterfølger">               <i>efterfølger</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="fjernelse">       <i>fjernelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="forskeruddannelse"><i>forskeruddannelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="førsteamanuensis">          <i>førsteamanuens</i><par n="amanuens/is__n"/></e>
<e lm="grundlægger">               <i>grundlægger</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="guldalder">                 <i>guldald</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="hundrede">                    <i>hundrede</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="istandsættelse">  <i>istandsættelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="kaliber">                   <i>kalib</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="påmindelse">      <i>påmindelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="vedligeholdelse"> <i>vedligeholdelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="kompendium">                <i>kompendi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="leder">                     <i>leder</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="neger">                     <i>neg</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="oprører">                  <i>oprører</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="ranger">                    <i>ranger</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="re">                        <i>re</i><par n="hygiejne_no-cp__n"/></e>
<e lm="romance">                   <i>romance</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="scenarium">                 <i>scenari</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="skriver">                   <i>skriver</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="slem">                      <i>slem</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="statsminister">             <i>statsminist</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="tender">                    <i>tender</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="værksted">                  <i>værksted</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
<e lm="åpner">                     <i>åpner</i><par n="buffer__n"/></e>
<e lm="adventskalender"><i>adventskalend</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="bakkekam"><i>bakkekam</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="balustrade"><i>balustrade</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="blodstrøm"><i>blodstrøm</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="bordkalender"><i>bordkalend</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="bymuseum"><i>bymuse</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="druebrændevin"><i>druebrændevin</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
<e lm="estime"><i>estime</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="faldlem"><i>faldlem</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="forsøgsstadium"><i>forsøgsstadi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="fremtidsdrøm"><i>fremtidsdrøm</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="holdningskampagne"><i>holdningskampagne</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="juleevangelium"><i>juleevangeli</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="kandelaber"><i>kandelab</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="krematorium"><i>krematori</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="holdkonkurrence"><i>holdkonkurrence</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="landsted"><i>landsted</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
<e lm="ligestrøm"><i>ligestrøm</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="obskurantisme"><i>obskurantisme</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="opholdssted"><i>opholdssted</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
<e lm="opvoksningssted"><i>opvoksningssted</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
<e lm="pjolter"><i>pjolt</i><par n="minist/er__n"/></e>
<e lm="præsidium"><i>præsidi</i><par n="podi/um__n"/></e>
<e lm="løbsledelse"><i>løbsledelse</i><par n="hygiejne_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="centrifuge"><i>centrifuge</i><par n="hygiejne__n"/></e>
<e lm="slutsum"><i>slutsum</i><par n="bom__n"/></e>
<e lm="websted"><i>websted</i><par n="sted__n"/></e>
